Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1848.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 62 O.S. 2021, Section 860, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 145, O.S.L. 2023 (62 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 860), is amended to read as follows:


Section 860. A. A project plan may contain a provision that


certain local taxes may be subject to incentives or may be exempted


in reinvestment areas, historic preservation areas, or enterprise


areas.

Req. No. 2891 Page 1


B. The governing body may grant incentives or exemptions from


local taxation only on the new investment made. No ad valorem tax


incentives or exemptions may be granted on the value of property


which has been assessed or which is subject to assessment prior to


the adoption of the project plan. No ad valorem tax incentives or


exemptions authorized in this section may be granted for retail


establishments or an establishment, the business of which is


described by National Industry Numbers 518210 and 221114 through


221117 of the North American Industry Classification System (NAICS)


Manual, latest revision. If a retail establishment or an


establishment, the business of which is described by National


Industry Numbers 518210 and 221114 through 221117 of the NAICS


Manual, latest revision, is located in property which otherwise


qualifies for an incentive or exemption pursuant to this section,


the incentive or exemption shall not be allowed for that portion of


the property used for such retail establishment or an establishment,


the business of which is described by National Industry Numbers


518210 and 221114 and 221115 of the NAICS Manual, latest revision.


As used in this subsection, “retail establishment” shall not include


an establishment that provides lodging including, but not limited


to, a hotel, apartment hotel, public rooming house, or motel. No ad


valorem tax incentives or exemptions authorized in this section may


be granted if the property is located in an increment district or as


long as the property is subject to the ad valorem tax exemption for

Req. No. 2891 Page 2


new or expanding manufacturing facilities as authorized by Section


6B of Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution. In the event of


disposition by lease or sublease to a lessee not entitled to an ad


valorem tax exemption, the improvements placed thereon shall not be


entitled to an ad valorem tax exemption provided for in Section 850


et seq. of this title. Except as otherwise provided by this


subsection, the incentives, or exemptions, which may be full or


partial, may be granted for a period not to exceed five (5) years.


With respect to an establishment, the business of which is described


by U.S. Industry Number 518210 of the North American Industry


Classification System (NAICS) Manual, 2017 revision, such incentives


or exemptions may be granted for a period not to exceed twenty-five


(25) years.


C. No incentives or exemptions may be granted to any business


or firm that is relocating from within the state and is subject to


or in the process of recruitment by two or more governmental


entities within the state unless the governmental entity in which


the business or firm does not locate adopts a resolution giving


their its approval to the granting of incentives or exemptions to


the business or firm locating in the competing governmental entity.


No incentives or exemptions may be granted to an out-of-state


business or firm that is subject to or in the process of recruitment


by two or more governmental entities within the state except as


otherwise provided for in this subsection. The prohibition against

Req. No. 2891 Page 3


incentives or exemptions to a business or firm relocating within the


state may be waived upon application by the governing body to, and


approval of, the Director Chief Executive Officer of the Oklahoma


Department of Commerce. In order for the Director Chief Executive


Officer to approve the waiver, the Director Chief Executive Officer


must find that the incentives or exemptions are necessary and


sufficient to attract the business or firm and that the benefits


generated by the business location outweigh the costs of the


business location.


D. A project plan may contain a provision that ad valorem taxes


may be exempted in a commercial historic preservation area that is


adjacent to and serves designated historical residential areas for


neighborhood commercial preservation purposes in order for the


neighborhood to retain its basic character and scale. No ad valorem


tax exemption may be granted on the value of property which has been


assessed or which is subject to assessment prior to the adoption of


the project plan. No ad valorem tax exemption shall be granted


pursuant to the provisions of this subsection for single-family


residences. The governing body may grant the exemption only on the


increase in value of the property. The exemptions may be granted


for a specific period of time as determined by a written agreement


between the property owners of the area and the governing body and


may be renewed. Uses of the property eligible for this exemption



Req. No. 2891 Page 4


may include, but not be limited to, commercial, office, or


multifamily residential use.


E. For increment districts in operation for nine (9) months or


more, on or before the ninetieth day following the end of each


fiscal year, the governing body of a city, town, or county shall


submit a report to the Oklahoma Department of Commerce. The


Department shall provide a copy of the report to any member of the


public upon request. The disclosure report shall include the


following information:


1. The amount and source of revenue captured and apportioned


pursuant to the project plan;


2. The amount and purpose of expenditures;


3. The amount of principal and interest due on outstanding


bonded indebtedness;


4. The tax increment base and current captured appraised value


or the other local tax or fee collections retained by the area;


5. The captured appraised value or the other local tax or fee


collections shared by the city, town, or county and other taxing


entities, the total amount of tax increments received, and any


additional information necessary to demonstrate compliance with the


plan adopted by the city, town, or county;


6. The name of the person who is currently in charge of the


implementation of the plan; and



Req. No. 2891 Page 5


7. The names of the persons who have disclosed an interest as


required pursuant to Section 857 of this title and the interest


disclosed.


F. For those incentive districts in operation for nine (9)


months or more, on or before the ninetieth day following the end of


each fiscal year, the governing body of a city, town, or county


shall submit a report to the Oklahoma Department of Commerce. The


Department shall provide a copy of the report to any member of the


public upon request. The disclosure report shall include the


following information:


1. The parties receiving incentives or exemptions;


2. A general description of the property and the improvements


to be made;


3. The portion and fair market value of the property to be


exempted or that portion of the local taxes to be subject to


incentives or to be exempted;


4. The duration of the incentives or exemptions;


5. Any additional information necessary to demonstrate


compliance with the tax incentives or exemptions;


6. The name of the person who is currently in charge of the


implementation of the plan; and


7. The names of the persons who have disclosed an interest as


required pursuant to Section 857 of this title and the interest


disclosed.

Req. No. 2891 Page 6


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 62 O.S. 2021, Section 861, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 861. A. A project plan may contain a provision that


the increments from certain local taxes or fees may be used to


finance project costs in areas qualified under the Local Development


Act. The increment from local taxes or fees levied from and after


the effective date of the approval of such plan shall be apportioned


in the following manner for a period not to exceed twenty-five (25)


fiscal years thereafter or the period required for payment of


project costs, whichever is less; provided, however, that for any


increment district established after November 1, 1992, such time


period shall be tolled for a period of time equal to the pendency of


any litigation directly or indirectly challenging the increment


district or apportionment or disbursement:


1. That portion of the ad valorem taxes which are produced by


the levy at the rate fixed each year by or for each such ad valorem


taxing entity upon the base assessed value of the increment district


determined pursuant to Section 862 of this title and as to an area


later added to the increment district, the effective date of the


addition to the increment district, shall be paid to each taxing


entity and all or any portion of local sales taxes, other local


taxes or local fees collected each year which are not subject to


apportionment shall be paid or retained as otherwise provided by


law; and

Req. No. 2891 Page 7


2. All or any portion of:


a. ad valorem taxes, in excess of such amount specified


in paragraph 1 of this subsection,


b. the increment of local sales taxes, other local taxes


or local fees, or a combination thereof, paid to or


for the benefit of the city, town, or county approving


the plan, and


c. with its consent, evidenced by agreement in writing,


the increment of local sales tax, other local taxes or


local fees, or combination thereof, payable to any


other local public taxing entity,


shall be apportioned to, and when collected, shall be paid into an


apportionment fund established for the project pursuant to the


project plan. Such revenues shall be used for the payment of the


project costs and for the payment of the principal of, the interest


on, and any premiums due in connection with the bonds of, loans,


notes, or advances of money to, or indebtedness incurred to finance


project costs, whether funded, refunded, assumed, or otherwise, for


financing, in whole or in part, eligible project costs. For the


purposes of this section, “local sales tax” means amounts payable to


or for the benefit of a local governmental entity calculated as a


percentage of gross sales whether imposed by ordinance, resolution,


covenant, or agreement. Nothing shall prohibit the increments from


being used to directly pay eligible project costs. When all

Req. No. 2891 Page 8


eligible project costs and such bonds, loans, advances of money or


indebtedness, if any, including interest thereon and any premiums


due in connection with them, have been paid and the governing body


adopts an ordinance or resolution dissolving the tax apportionment


financing, all ad valorem taxes upon the taxable property within the


boundary of such district shall be paid into the funds of the


respective taxing entities.


B. If a project plan contains a provision for apportionment as


provided in subsection A of this section, and notwithstanding any


other provision of law to the contrary, the governing body shall


direct in the resolution or ordinance approving the plan which


portion of the increments, including whether any or all, to be paid


into the apportionment fund shall constitute a part of the general


fund to be appropriated annually by the governing body, and which


portion, including whether any or all, shall constitute funds of a


public entity authorized to issue tax apportionment bonds or notes


or to incur project costs.


C. To the extent that collections exceed project costs and the


provisions for payment of principal and interest along with


sufficient reserves on any bonds issued pursuant to the provisions


of Section 863 of this title, the excess shall be paid into the


funds of the respective taxing entities unless the taxing entity


agrees to some other use of such collections.



Req. No. 2891 Page 9


D. Except as provided in subsection E of this section, for any


year in which taxes or fees are apportioned in the manner specified


in paragraph 2 of subsection A of this section, any increase in


assessed valuation of taxable real property or taxable personal


property within the boundaries of such district in excess of the


base assessed value shall not be considered by any taxing entity in


computing any debt limitation or for any other purpose except for


the levy of taxes and in determining the amount to be apportioned.


E. In the event there is a change in the assessment ratio for


ad valorem tax property valuations of property within the boundaries


of an increment district, the portions of valuations for assessment


pursuant to paragraphs 1 and 2 of subsection A of this section shall


be proportionately adjusted in accordance with such reassessment.


F. Nothing in this section shall be construed as relieving


property in such project area from being assessed as provided in the


Ad Valorem Tax Code of the Oklahoma Statutes, or as relieving owners


of such property from paying a uniform rate of taxes, as required by


Section 5 of Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution.


G. Subject to constitutional exemptions, if property in an


increment district is owned by a public entity and is leased to or


operated for a private use, including, without limitation, use by a


not-for-profit corporation or trust, the portion of the property so


leased or operated shall be assessed by the county assessor as if


such portion of the property were taxable, and, during the term of

Req. No. 2891 Page 10


the increment district, the public entity owning such property shall


pay or require the user thereof to pay ad valorem taxes or an in


lieu ad valorem tax payment in an amount not less than the amount


that would have resulted if taxes had otherwise been levied on such


portion of the property. If property subject to ad valorem tax in


an increment district is acquired by a private not-for-profit


corporation or public or private trust, it shall continue to be


assessed and subject to ad valorem taxes or an in lieu ad valorem


payment by the user thereof until termination of the increment


district unless and only to the extent of the portion of the


property and the use thereof that is:


1. Acquired to implement the project plan;


2. Converted to a new tax-exempt use by a tax-exempt user; or


3. Entitled to claim a constitutional exemption notwithstanding


statutory provisions.


During the period of an increment district, such nonexempt uses and


interests are severable for purposes of ad valorem and in lieu of ad


valorem assessment and payments, notwithstanding any statutory


provisions to the contrary.


H. Increment districts authorized pursuant to this section


shall not include the property of an establishment, the business of


which is described by National Industry Numbers 518210 and 221114


through 221117 of the North American Industry Classification System


(NAICS) Manual, latest revision.

Req. No. 2891 Page 11


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2902, as


last amended by Section 1, Chapter 411, O.S.L. 2025 (68 O.S. Supp.


2025, Section 2902), is amended to read as follows:


Section 2902. A. Except as otherwise provided by subsection H


of Section 3658 of this title pursuant to which the exemption


authorized by this section may not be claimed, a qualifying


manufacturing concern, as defined by Section 6B of Article X of the


Oklahoma Constitution, and as further defined herein, shall be


exempt from the levy of any ad valorem taxes upon new, expanded, or


acquired manufacturing facilities including facilities engaged in


research and development, for a period of five (5) years. The


provisions of Section 6B of Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution


requiring an existing facility to have been unoccupied for a period


of twelve (12) months prior to acquisition shall be construed as a


qualification for a facility to initially receive an exemption, and


shall not be deemed to be a qualification for that facility to


continue to receive an exemption in each of the four (4) years


following the initial year for which the exemption was granted.


Such facilities are hereby classified for the purposes of taxation


as provided in Section 22 of Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution.


B. For purposes of this section, the following definitions


shall apply:


1. “Manufacturing facilities” means facilities engaged in the


mechanical or chemical transformation of materials or substances

Req. No. 2891 Page 12


into new products and except as provided by paragraph 6 of


subsection C of this section shall include:


a. establishments which have received a manufacturer


exemption permit pursuant to the provisions of Section


1359.2 of this title,


b. facilities including repair and replacement parts,


primarily engaged in aircraft repair, building and


rebuilding whether or not on a factory basis,


c. establishments primarily engaged in computer services


and data processing as defined under Industrial Group


Numbers 5112 and 5415, and U.S. Industry Number


Numbers 334611 and 519130 of the NAICS North American


Industry Classification System (NAICS) Manual, latest


revision, and which derive at least fifty percent


(50%) of their annual gross revenues from the sale of


a product or service to an out-of-state buyer or


consumer, and as defined under Industrial Group Number


5182 of the NAICS Manual, latest revision, which


derive at least eighty percent (80%) of their annual


gross revenues from the sale of a product or service


to an out-of-state buyer or consumer. Eligibility as


a manufacturing facility pursuant to this subparagraph


shall be established, subject to review by the


Oklahoma Tax Commission, by annually filing an

Req. No. 2891 Page 13


affidavit with the Tax Commission stating that the


facility so qualifies and such other information as


required by the Tax Commission. For purposes of


determining whether annual gross revenues are derived


from sales to out-of-state buyers, all sales to the


federal government shall be considered to be to an


out-of-state buyer,


d. facilities that the investment cost of the


construction, acquisition or expansion is Five Hundred


Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) or more with respect to


assets placed into service during calendar year 2022.


For subsequent calendar years, the investment required


shall be increased annually by a percentage equal to


the previous year’s increase in the Consumer Price


Index-All Index for All Urban Consumers (“CPI-U”)


(CPI-U) and such adjusted amount shall be the required


investment cost in order to qualify for the exemption


authorized by this section. The Oklahoma Department


of Commerce shall determine the amount of the


increase, if any, on January 1 of each year. The


Oklahoma Tax Commission shall publish on its website


at least annually the adjusted dollar amount in order


to qualify for the exemption authorized by this


section and shall include the adjusted dollar amount

Req. No. 2891 Page 14


in any of its relevant forms or publications with


respect to the exemption. Provided, “investment cost”


shall not include the cost of direct replacement,


refurbishment, repair or maintenance of existing


machinery or equipment, except that investment cost


shall include capital expenditures for direct


replacement, refurbishment, repair or maintenance of


existing machinery or equipment that qualifies for


depreciation and/or amortization pursuant to the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and such


expenditures shall be eligible as a part of an


expansion that otherwise qualifies under this section,


e. establishments primarily engaged in distribution as


defined under Industry Numbers 49311, 49312, 49313 and


49319 and Industry Sector Number 42 of the NAICS


Manual, latest revision, and which meet the following


qualifications:


(1) construction with an initial capital investment


of at least Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00),


(2) employment of at least one hundred (100) full-


time-equivalent employees, as certified by the


Oklahoma Employment Security Commission,


(3) payment of wages or salaries to its employees at


a wage which equals or exceeds the average wage

Req. No. 2891 Page 15


requirements in the Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program


Act for the year in which the real property was


placed into service, and


(4) commencement of construction on or after November


1, 2007, with construction to be completed within


three (3) years from the date of the commencement


of construction,


f. facilities engaged in the manufacturing, compounding,


processing or fabrication of materials into articles


of tangible personal property according to the special


order of a customer (custom order manufacturing) by


manufacturers classified as operating in North


American Industry Classification System (NAICS) NAICS


Sectors 32 and 33, but does not include such custom


order manufacturing by manufacturers classified in


other NAICS code sectors, and


g. with respect to any entity making an application for


the exemption authorized by this section on or after


January 1, 2023, the establishment making application


for exempt treatment of real or personal property


acquired or improved beginning January 1, 2022, and


for any calendar year thereafter, the entity shall be


required to pay new direct jobs, as defined by Section


3603 of this title for purposes of the Oklahoma

Req. No. 2891 Page 16


Quality Jobs Program Act, an average annualized wage


which equals or exceeds the average wage requirement


in the Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program Act for the year


in which the real or personal property was placed into


service. The Oklahoma Tax Commission may request


verification from the Oklahoma Department of Commerce


that an establishment seeking an exemption for real or


personal property pays an average annualized wage that


equals or exceeds the average wage requirement in


effect for the year in which the real or personal


property was placed into service. For purposes of


this subparagraph, it shall not be necessary for the


establishment to qualify for incentive payments


pursuant to the Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program Act, but


the establishment shall be subject to the wage


requirements of the Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program Act


with respect to new direct jobs in order to qualify


for the exempt treatment authorized by this section.


Eligibility as a manufacturing facility pursuant to this


subparagraph shall be established, subject to review by the Tax


Commission, by annually filing an affidavit with the Tax Commission


stating that the facility so qualifies and containing such other


information as required by the Tax Commission.



Req. No. 2891 Page 17


Provided, eating and drinking places, as well as other retail


establishments, shall not qualify as manufacturing facilities for


purposes of this section, nor shall centrally assessed properties.


Eligibility as a manufacturing facility pursuant to this


subparagraph shall be established, subject to review by the Tax


Commission, by annually filing an application with the Tax


Commission stating that the facility so qualifies and containing


such other information as required by the Tax Commission;


2. “Facility” and “facilities”, except as otherwise provided by


this section, means and includes the land, buildings, structures and


improvements used directly and exclusively in the manufacturing


process. Effective January 1, 2022, and for each calendar year


thereafter, for establishments which have received a manufacturer


exemption permit pursuant to the provisions of Section 1359.2 of


this title, or facilities engaged in manufacturing activities


defined or classified in the NAICS Manual under National Industry


Nos. Numbers 311111 through 339999, inclusive, but for no other


establishments, facility and facilities means and includes the land,


buildings, structures, improvements, machinery, fixtures, equipment


and other personal property used directly and exclusively in the


manufacturing process; and


3. “Research and development” means activities directly related


to and conducted for the purpose of discovering, enhancing,



Req. No. 2891 Page 18


increasing or improving future or existing products or processes or


productivity.


C. The following provisions shall apply:


1. A manufacturing concern shall be entitled to the exemption


herein provided for each new manufacturing facility constructed,


each existing manufacturing facility acquired and the expansion of


existing manufacturing facilities on the same site, as such terms


are defined by Section 6B of Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution


and by this section;


2. No manufacturing concern shall receive more than one five-


year exemption for any one manufacturing facility unless the


expansion which qualifies the manufacturing facility for an


additional five-year exemption meets the requirements of paragraph 4


of this subsection and the employment level established for any


previous exemption is maintained;


3. Any exemption as to the expansion of an existing


manufacturing facility shall be limited to the increase in ad


valorem taxes directly attributable to the expansion;


4. All initial applications for any exemption for a new,


acquired or expanded manufacturing facility shall be granted only


if:


a. there is a net increase in annualized base payroll


over the initial payroll of at least Two Hundred Fifty


Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00) if the facility is

Req. No. 2891 Page 19


located in a county with a population of fewer than


seventy-five thousand (75,000), according to the most


recent Federal Decennial Census, while maintaining or


increasing base payroll in subsequent years, or at


least One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) if the


facility is located in a county with a population of


seventy-five thousand (75,000) or more, according to


the most recent Federal Decennial Census, while


maintaining or increasing base payroll in subsequent


years; provided, the payroll requirement of this


subparagraph shall be waived for claims for exemptions


including claims previously denied or on appeal on


March 3, 2010, for all initial applications for


exemption filed on or after January 1, 2004, and on or


before March 31, 2009, and all subsequent annual


exemption applications filed related to the initial


application for exemption, for an applicant, if the


facility has been located in Oklahoma for at least


fifteen (15) years engaged in marine engine


manufacturing as defined under U.S. Industry Number


333618 of the NAICS Manual, latest revision, and has


maintained an average employment of five hundred (500)


or more full-time-equivalent employees over a ten-year


period. Any applicant that qualifies for the payroll

Req. No. 2891 Page 20


requirement waiver as outlined in the previous


sentence and subsequently closes its Oklahoma


manufacturing plant prior to January 1, 2012, may be


disqualified for exemption and subject to recapture.


For an applicant engaged in paperboard manufacturing


as defined under U.S. Industry Number 322130 of the


NAICS Manual, latest revision, union master payouts


paid by the buyer of the facility to specified


individuals employed by the facility at the time of


purchase, as specified under the purchase agreement,


shall be excluded from payroll for purposes of this


section.


In order to provide certainty with respect to


investments in manufacturing facilities pertaining to


all initial applications for exemption filed on or


after January 1, 2016, the following definitions shall


apply:


(1) “base payroll” shall mean total payroll adjusted


for any nonrecurring bonuses, exercise of stock


option or stock rights and other nonrecurring,


extraordinary items included in total payroll,


and





Req. No. 2891 Page 21


(2) “initial payroll” shall mean base payroll for the


year immediately preceding the initial


construction, acquisition or expansion.


The Tax Commission shall verify payroll


information through the Oklahoma Employment


Security Commission by using reports from the


Oklahoma Employment Security Commission for the


calendar year immediately preceding the year for


which initial application is made for base-line


baseline payroll, which must be maintained or


increased for each subsequent year; provided, a


manufacturing facility shall have the option of


excluding from its payroll, for purposes of this


section:


i. payments to sole proprietors, members


of a partnership, members of a limited


liability company who own at least ten


percent (10%) of the capital of the


limited liability company or


stockholder-employees of a corporation


who own at least ten percent (10%) of


the stock in the corporation, and


ii. any nonrecurring bonuses, exercise of


stock option or stock rights or other

Req. No. 2891 Page 22


nonrecurring, extraordinary items


included in total payroll numbers as


reported by the Oklahoma Employment


Security Commission. A manufacturing


facility electing either option shall


indicate such election upon its


application for an exemption under this


section. Any manufacturing facility


electing either option shall submit


such information as the Tax Commission


may require in order to verify payroll


information. Payroll information


submitted pursuant to the provisions of


this paragraph shall be submitted to


the Tax Commission and shall be subject


to the provisions of Section 205 of


this title, and


b. the facility offers, or will offer within one hundred


eighty (180) days of the date of employment, a basic


health benefits plan to the full-time-equivalent


employees of the facility, which is determined by the


Oklahoma Department of Commerce to consist of the


elements specified in subparagraph b of paragraph 1 of



Req. No. 2891 Page 23


subsection A of Section 3603 of this title or elements


substantially equivalent thereto.


For purposes of this section, calculation of the amount of


increased base payroll shall be measured from the start of initial


construction or expansion to the completion of such construction or


expansion or for three (3) years from the start of initial


construction or expansion, whichever occurs first. The amount of


increased base payroll shall include payroll for full-time-


equivalent employees in this state who are employed by an entity


other than the facility which has previously or is currently


qualified to receive an exemption pursuant to the provisions of this


section and who are leased or otherwise provided to the facility, if


such employment did not exist in this state prior to the start of


initial construction or expansion of the facility. The


manufacturing concern shall submit an affidavit to the Tax


Commission, signed by an officer, stating that the construction,


acquisition or expansion of the facility will result in a net


increase in the annualized base payroll as required by this


paragraph and that full-time-equivalent employees of the facility


are or will be offered a basic health benefits plan as required by


this paragraph. If, after the completion of such construction or


expansion or after three (3) years from the start of initial


construction or expansion, whichever occurs first, the construction,


acquisition or expansion has not resulted in a net increase in the

Req. No. 2891 Page 24


amount of annualized base payroll, if required, or any other


qualification specified in this paragraph has not been met, the


manufacturing concern shall pay an amount equal to the amount of any


exemption granted including penalties and interest thereon, to the


Tax Commission for deposit to the Ad Valorem Reimbursement Fund;


5. Except as otherwise provided by this paragraph, any new,


acquired or expanded computer data processing, data preparation or


information processing services provider classified in U.S. Industry


Number 518210 of the North American Industrial Classification System


(NAICS) NAICS Manual, 2017 revision, may apply for exemptions under


this section for each year in which new, acquired, or expanded


capital improvements to the facility are made for assets placed in


service not later than December 31, 2021, if:


a. there is a net increase in annualized payroll of the


applicant at any facility or facilities of the


applicant in this state of at least Two Hundred Fifty


Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00), which is attributable


to the capital improvements, or a net increase of


Seven Million Dollars ($7,000,000.00) or more in


capital improvements, while maintaining or increasing


payroll at the facility or facilities in this state


which are included in the application, and


b. the facility offers, or will offer within one hundred


eighty (180) days of the date of employment of new

Req. No. 2891 Page 25


employees attributable to the capital improvements, a


basic health benefits plan to the full-time-equivalent


employees of the facility, which is determined by the


Oklahoma Department of Commerce to consist of the


elements specified in subparagraph b of paragraph 1 of


subsection A of Section 3603 of this title or elements


substantially equivalent thereto.


An establishment described by this paragraph, the primary


business activity of which is described by National Industry No.


Number 518210 of the North American Industry Classification System


(NAICS) NAICS Manual, 2017 revision, that has applied for and been


granted an exemption for personal property at any time within five


(5) years prior to November 1, 2021, may apply for exemptions for


items of eligible personal property to be located within


improvements to real property and such real property and


improvements having been exempt from ad valorem taxation prior to


November 1, 2021, pursuant to the provisions of this section if such


personal property is placed in service not later than December 31,


2036 2026. No additional personal property of such establishment


placed in service after such date shall qualify for the exempt


treatment otherwise authorized pursuant to this paragraph;


6. Effective January 1, 2017, an entity engaged in electric


power generation by means of wind, as described by the North


American Industry Classification System, No. 221119, shall not be

Req. No. 2891 Page 26


defined as a qualifying manufacturing concern for purposes of the


exemption otherwise authorized pursuant to Section 6B of Article X


of the Oklahoma Constitution or qualify as a manufacturing facility


as defined in this section. No initial application for exemption


shall be filed by or accepted from an entity engaged in electric


power generation by means of wind on or after January 1, 2018;


7. An entity or applicant engaged in an industry as defined


under U.S. Industry Number 324110 of the NAICS Manual, latest


revision, which has applied for or been granted an exemption for a


time period which began on or after calendar year 2012 and before


calendar year 2016 but which did not meet the payroll requirements


of subparagraph a of paragraph 4 of this subsection because of


nonrecurring bonuses, exercise of stock option or stock rights or


other nonrecurring, extraordinary items included in total payroll in


the previous year, shall be allowed an exemption, beginning with


calendar year 2016, for the number of years including the calendar


year for which the exemption was denied, remaining in the entity’s


five-year exemption period, provided such entity attains or


increases payroll at or above the initial or base payroll


established for the exemption;


8. A facility engaged in manufacturing defined under U.S.


Industry Number 327310 of the NAICS Manual shall have the payroll


requirements of paragraph 4 of this subsection waived for tax year


2021, which is based in part on the 2020 calendar year payroll

Req. No. 2891 Page 27


reported to the Oklahoma Employment Security Commission, and may


continue to receive the exemption for the five-year period provided


in this section only if all other requirements of this section are


met; and


9. A facility engaged in manufacturing which otherwise


qualifies for the exemption or exemptions pursuant to the provisions


of this section shall have the payroll requirements of paragraph 4


of this subsection waived for tax year 2021, which is based in part


on the 2020 calendar year payroll reported to the Oklahoma


Employment Security Commission, and for tax year 2022, which is


based in part on the 2021 calendar year payroll reported to the


Oklahoma Employment Security Commission, and may continue to receive


the exemption for the five-year period provided in this section only


if all other requirements of this section are met. Provided, a


facility engaged in manufacturing as defined under Industrial Group


Number 3364 of the NAICS Manual, latest revision, which otherwise


qualifies or qualified to receive the exemption for the five-year


period provided in this section, including claims previously denied,


shall have the payroll requirements of paragraph 4 of this


subsection waived for the five-year exemption period of those


initial exemption applications filed after January 1, 2020, and


before March 16, 2021; and


10. Establishments primarily engaged in computer services and


data processing as defined under Industrial Group Number 5415 of the

Req. No. 2891 Page 28


North American Industry Classification System (NAICS) Manual, latest


revision, may apply for exemptions under this section for each year


in which new, acquired, or expanded capital improvements to the


facility are made for assets placed in service not later than


December 31, 2026.


D. 1. Except as provided in paragraph 2 of this subsection,


the five-year period of exemption from ad valorem taxes for any


qualifying manufacturing facility property shall begin on January 1


following the initial qualifying use of the property in the


manufacturing process.


2. The five-year period of exemption from ad valorem taxes for


any qualifying manufacturing facility, as specified in subparagraphs


a and b of this paragraph, which is located within a tax incentive


district created pursuant to the Local Development Act by a county


having a population of at least five hundred thousand (500,000),


according to the most recent Federal Decennial Census, shall begin


on January 1 following the expiration or termination of the ad


valorem exemption, abatement, or other incentive provided through


the tax incentive district. Facilities qualifying pursuant to this


subsection shall include:


a. a manufacturing facility as defined in subparagraph c


of paragraph 1 of subsection B of this section, and


b. an establishment primarily engaged in distribution as


defined under Industry Number 49311 of the North

Req. No. 2891 Page 29


American Industry Classification System for which the


initial capital investment was at least One Hundred


Eighty Million Dollars ($180,000,000.00); provided,


that the qualifying job creation and depreciable


property investment occurred prior to calendar year


2017 but not earlier than calendar year 2013.


E. Any person, firm or corporation claiming the exemption


herein provided for shall file each year for which exemption is


claimed, an application therefor with the county assessor of the


county in which the new, expanded or acquired facility is located.


The application shall be on a form or forms prescribed by the Tax


Commission, and shall be filed on or before March 15, except as


provided in Section 2902.1 of this title, of each year in which the


facility desires to take the exemption or within thirty (30) days


from and after receipt by such person, firm or corporation of notice


of valuation increase, whichever is later. In a case where


completion of the facility or facilities will occur after January 1


of a given year, a facility may apply to claim the ad valorem tax


exemption for that year. If such facility is found to be qualified


for exemption, the ad valorem tax exemption provided for herein


shall be granted for that entire year and shall apply to the ad


valorem valuation as of January 1 of that given year. For


applicants who qualify under the provisions of subparagraph b of


paragraph 1 of subsection B of this section, the application shall

Req. No. 2891 Page 30


include a copy of the affidavit and any other information required


to be filed with the Tax Commission.


F. The application shall be examined by the county assessor and


approved or rejected in the same manner as provided by law for


approval or rejection of claims for homestead exemptions. The


taxpayer shall have the same right of review by and appeal from the


county board of equalization, in the same manner and subject to the


same requirements as provided by law for review and appeals


concerning homestead exemption claims. Approved applications shall


be filed by the county assessor with the Tax Commission no later


than June 15, except as provided in Section 2902.1 of this title, of


the year in which the facility desires to take the exemption.


Incomplete applications and applications filed after June 15 will be


declared null and void by the Tax Commission. In the event that a


taxpayer qualified to receive an exemption pursuant to the


provisions of this section shall make payment of ad valorem taxes in


excess of the amount due, the county treasurer shall have the


authority to credit the taxpayer’s real or personal property tax


overpayment against current taxes due. The county treasurer may


establish a schedule of up to five (5) years of credit to resolve


the overpayment.


G. Nothing herein shall in any manner affect, alter or impair


any law relating to the assessment of property, and all property,


real or personal, which may be entitled to exemption hereunder shall

Req. No. 2891 Page 31


be valued and assessed as is other like property and as provided by


law. The valuation and assessment of property for which an


exemption is granted hereunder shall be performed by the Tax


Commission using one or more of the cost, income and expense and


sales comparison approaches to estimate fair cash value in


accordance with the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal


Practice.


H. The Tax Commission shall have the authority and duty to


prescribe forms and to promulgate rules as may be necessary to carry


out and administer the terms and provisions of this section.


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2891 QD 1/14/2026 11:58:35 PM























Req. No. 2891 Page 32